Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 22
COLORADO SEX OFFENDER REGISTRATION ACT

Section

16-22-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Sex Offender Registration Act".

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire article added, p. 1157, § 1, effective July 1.

16-22-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 22, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adjudicated" or "adjudication" means a determination by the court that it has been proven beyond a reasonable doubt to the trier of fact that a juvenile has committed a delinquent act or that a juvenile has pled guilty to committing a delinquent act. In addition, when a previous conviction must be pled and proven as an element of an offense or for purposes of sentence enhancement, "adjudication" means conviction.

(1.5) "Birthday" means a person's birthday as reflected on the notice provided to the person pursuant to section 16-22-106 or 16-22-107 or the person's actual date of birth if the notice does not reflect the person's birthday.

"CBI" means the Colorado bureau of investigation established pursuant to part 4 of article 33.5 of title 24, C.R.S.

"Convicted" or "conviction" means having received a verdict of guilty by a judge or jury, having pleaded guilty or nolo contendere, having received a disposition as a juvenile, having been adjudicated a juvenile delinquent, or having received a deferred judgment and sentence or a deferred adjudication.

(3.5) "Employed at an institution of postsecondary education" means a person:

Is employed by or is an independent contractor with an institution of postsecondary education or is employed by or is an independent contractor with an entity that contracts with an institution of postsecondary education; and

Spends any period of time in furtherance of the employment or independent contractor relationship on the campus of the postsecondary institution or at a site that is owned or leased by the postsecondary institution.

"Immediate family" means a person's spouse, parent, grandparent, sibling, or child.

(4.2) "Juvenile" means a person who is under eighteen years of age at the time of the offense and who has not been criminally convicted in the district court of unlawful sexual behavior pursuant to section 19-2.5-801 or 19-2.5-802.

(4.3) (a) "Lacks a fixed residence" means that a person does not have a living situation that meets the definition of "residence" pursuant to subsection (5.7) of this section. "Lacks a fixed residence" may include, but need not be limited to, outdoor sleeping locations or any public or private locations not designed as traditional living accommodations. "Lacks a fixed residence" may also include temporary public or private housing or temporary shelter facilities, residential treatment facilities, or any other residential program or facility if the person remains at the location for less than fourteen days.

"Lacks a fixed residence" also includes a person who is registered in any jurisdiction if the person:

Ceases to reside at an address in that jurisdiction; and

Fails to register:

A change of address in the same jurisdiction; or

In a new jurisdiction pursuant to section 16-22-108 (4); or

Pursuant to section 16-22-108 (3).

(4.5) "Local law enforcement agency" means the law enforcement agency, including but not limited to a campus police agency, that has jurisdiction over a certain geographic area.

"Register" and "registration" include initial registration pursuant to section 16-22-104, and registration, confirmation of registration, and reregistration, as required in section 16-22-108.

(5.5) "Registrant" means a person who is required to register in accordance with this article.

(5.7) "Residence" means a place or dwelling that is used, intended to be used, or usually used for habitation by a person who is required to register pursuant to section 16-22-103. "Residence" may include, but need not be limited to, a temporary shelter or institution, if the person resides at the temporary shelter or institution for fourteen consecutive days or longer, if the owner of the shelter or institution consents to the person utilizing the shelter or institution as his or her registered address as required by section 16-22-106 (4) or 16-22-107 (4)(a), and if the residence of the person at the shelter or institution can be verified as required by section 16-22-109 (3.5). A person may establish multiple residences by residing in more than one place or dwelling.

(5.8) "Resides" includes residence and lacks a fixed residence.

"Sex offender registry" means the Colorado sex offender registry created and maintained by the CBI pursuant to section 16-22-110.

"Sexually violent predator" means a person who is found to be a sexually violent predator pursuant to section 18-3-414.5, C.R.S.

"Temporary resident" means a person who is a resident of another state but in Colorado temporarily because the person is:

Employed in this state on a full-time or part-time basis, with or without compensation, for more than fourteen consecutive business days or for an aggregate period of more than thirty days in any calendar year; or

Enrolled in any type of educational institution in this state on a full-time or part-time basis; or

Present in Colorado for more than fourteen consecutive business days or for an aggregate period of more than thirty days in a calendar year for any purpose, including but not limited to vacation, travel, or retirement.

"Unlawful sexual behavior" means any of the following offenses or criminal attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any of the following offenses:

Sexual assault, in violation of section 18-3-402, C.R.S.; or

Sexual assault in the first degree, in violation of section 18-3-402, C.R.S., as it existed prior to July 1, 2000;

Sexual assault in the second degree, in violation of section 18-3-403, C.R.S., as it existed prior to July 1, 2000;

Unlawful sexual contact, in violation of section 18-3-404, C.R.S.; or

Sexual assault in the third degree, in violation of section 18-3-404, C.R.S., as it existed prior to July 1, 2000;

Sexual assault on a child, in violation of section 18-3-405, C.R.S.;

Sexual assault on a child by one in a position of trust, in violation of section 18-3-405.3, C.R.S.;

Sexual assault on a client by a psychotherapist, in violation of section 18-3-405.5, C.R.S.;

Enticement of a child, in violation of section 18-3-305, C.R.S.;

Incest, in violation of section 18-6-301, C.R.S.;

Aggravated incest, in violation of section 18-6-302, C.R.S.;

Human trafficking of a minor for sexual servitude, as described in section 18-3-504 (2), C.R.S.;

Human trafficking for sexual servitude, as described in section 18-3-504 (1);

Sexual exploitation of children, in violation of section 18-6-403, C.R.S.;

Procurement of a child for sexual exploitation, in violation of section 18-6-404, C.R.S.;

Indecent exposure, in violation of section 18-7-302, C.R.S.;

Soliciting for child prostitution, in violation of section 18-7-402, C.R.S.;

Pandering of a child, in violation of section 18-7-403, C.R.S.;

Procurement of a child, in violation of section 18-7-403.5, C.R.S.;

Keeping a place of child prostitution, in violation of section 18-7-404, C.R.S.;

Pimping of a child, in violation of section 18-7-405, C.R.S.;

Inducement of child prostitution, in violation of section 18-7-405.5, C.R.S.;

Patronizing a prostituted child, in violation of section 18-7-406, C.R.S.;

Engaging in sexual conduct in a correctional institution, in violation of section 18-7-701, C.R.S.;

Wholesale promotion of obscenity to a minor, in violation of section 18-7-102 (1.5), C.R.S.;

Promotion of obscenity to a minor, in violation of section 18-7-102 (2.5), C.R.S.;

Class 4 felony internet luring of a child, in violation of section 18-3-306 (3), C.R.S.;

Internet sexual exploitation of a child, in violation of section 18-3-405.4, C.R.S.;

Public indecency, committed in violation of section 18-7-301 (2)(b), C.R.S., if a second offense is committed within five years of the previous offense or a third or subsequent offense is committed;

Invasion of privacy for sexual gratification, in violation of section 18-3-405.6;

Second degree kidnapping, if committed in violation of section 18-3-302 (3)(a);

Unlawful electronic sexual communication, in violation of section 18-3-418; or

Unlawful sexual conduct by a peace officer, in violation of section 18-3-405.7.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire article added, p. 1157, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(9)(v) and (9)(w) added, p. 800, § 1, effective May 21; (3.5), (4.5), (5.5), and (5.7) added and (8) amended, p. 1107, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2006:

(5.7) amended, p. 1006, § 3, effective July 1; (9)(x) and (9)(y) added, p. 2054, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(9)(j) amended, (SB 10-140), ch. 156, p. 537, § 6, effective April 21; (9)(u) amended, (HB 10-1277), ch. 262, p. 1190, § 2, effective July 1; (9)(x) and (9)(y) amended and (9)(z) added, (HB 10-1334), ch. 359, p. 1708, § 3, effective August 11; (9)(x) and (9)(y) amended and (9)(aa) added, (SB 10-128), ch. 415, p. 2047, § 8, effective July 1, 2012.

L. 2011:

(9)(bb) added, (HB 11-1278), ch. 224, p. 960, § 3, effective May 27.

L. 2012:

(4.3) and (5.8) added and (5.7) amended, (HB 12-1346), ch. 220, p. 940, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(9)(j) amended, (HB 14-1273), ch. 282, p. 1153, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

IP amended and (9)(j.5) added, (HB 17-1072), ch. 250, p. 1050, § 3, effective September 1.

L. 2019:

(9)(aa) and (9)(bb) amended and (9)(cc) added, (HB 19-1030), ch. 145, p. 1760, § 3, effective July 1; (9)(aa) and (9)(bb) amended and (9)(dd) added, (HB 19-1250), ch. 287, p. 2663, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended and (1.5) and (4.2) added, (HB 21-1064), ch. 320, p. 1961, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2022:

(4.2) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2969, § 27, effective August 10.

16-22-103. Sex offender registration - required - applicability - exception.

Effective July 1, 1998, the following persons are required to register pursuant to section 16-22-108 and are subject to the requirements and other provisions specified in this article 22:

Any person who was convicted on or after July 1, 1991, in the state of Colorado of an unlawful sexual offense, as defined in section 18-3-411 (1), enticement of a child, as described in section 18-3-305, or internet luring of a child, as described in section 18-3-306 (3);

Any person who was convicted on or after July 1, 1991, in another state or jurisdiction, including but not limited to a military, tribal, territorial, or federal jurisdiction, of an offense that, if committed in Colorado, would constitute an unlawful sexual offense, as defined in section 18-3-411 (1), C.R.S., enticement of a child, as described in section 18-3-305, C.R.S., or internet luring of a child, as described in section 18-3-306, C.R.S.; and

Any person who was released on or after July 1, 1991, from the custody of the department of corrections of this state or any other state, having served a sentence for an unlawful sexual offense, as defined in section 18-3-411 (1), C.R.S., enticement of a child, as described in section 18-3-305, C.R.S., or internet luring of a child, as described in section 18-3-306, C.R.S.

On and after July 1, 1994, any person who is convicted in the state of Colorado of unlawful sexual behavior or of another offense, the underlying factual basis of which involves unlawful sexual behavior, or any person who is released from the custody of the department of corrections having completed serving a sentence for unlawful sexual behavior or for another offense, the underlying factual basis of which involved unlawful sexual behavior, shall be required to register in the manner prescribed in section 16-22-104, section 16-22-106 or 16-22-107, whichever is applicable, and section 16-22-108.

A person shall be deemed to have been convicted of unlawful sexual behavior if he or she is convicted of one or more of the offenses specified in section 16-22-102 (9), or of attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit one or more of the offenses specified in said section.

For convictions entered on or after July 1, 2002, a person shall be deemed to be convicted of an offense, the underlying factual basis of which involves unlawful sexual behavior, if:

The person is convicted of an offense that requires proof of unlawful sexual behavior as an element of the offense; or

The person is convicted of an offense and is eligible for and receives an enhanced sentence based on a circumstance that requires proof of unlawful sexual behavior; or

The person was originally charged with unlawful sexual behavior or with an offense that meets the description in sub-subparagraph (A) or (B) of this subparagraph (I), the person pleads guilty to an offense that does not constitute unlawful sexual behavior, and, as part of the plea agreement, the person admits, after advisement as provided in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (c), that the underlying factual basis of the offense to which he or she is pleading guilty involves unlawful sexual behavior; or

The person was charged with and convicted of an offense that does not constitute unlawful sexual behavior and the person admits on the record, after advisement as provided in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (c), that the underlying factual basis of the offense involved unlawful sexual behavior.

If a person is originally charged with unlawful sexual behavior or with an offense that meets the description in sub-subparagraph (A) or (B) of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c), the court may accept a plea agreement to an offense that does not constitute unlawful sexual behavior only if:

The district attorney stipulates that the underlying factual basis of the offense to which the person is pleading guilty does not involve unlawful sexual behavior; or

The person admits, after advisement as provided in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (c), that the underlying factual basis of the offense to which he or she is pleading guilty involves unlawful sexual behavior.

The advisement provided for purposes of this paragraph (c), in addition to meeting the requirements of the Colorado rules of criminal procedure, shall advise the person that admitting that the underlying factual basis of the offense to which the person is pleading or of which the person is convicted involves unlawful sexual behavior will have the collateral result of making the person subject to the requirements of this article. Notwithstanding any provision of this paragraph (c) to the contrary, failure to advise a person pursuant to the provisions of this subparagraph (III) shall not constitute a defense to the offense of failure to register as a sex offender if there is evidence that the defendant had actual notice of the duty to register.

In any case in which a person is deemed to have been convicted of an offense, the underlying factual basis of which involves unlawful sexual behavior, as provided in this paragraph (c), the judgment of conviction shall specify that the person is convicted of such an offense and specify the particular crime of unlawful sexual behavior involved.

The provisions of this paragraph (c) shall apply to juveniles for purposes of determining whether a juvenile is convicted of an offense, the underlying factual basis of which involves unlawful sexual behavior.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any stipulation by a district attorney and any finding by the court with regard to whether the offense of which the person is convicted includes an underlying factual basis involving unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102, shall be binding on the department of corrections for purposes of classification. On or after July 1, 2008, if the department of corrections receives a mittimus that does not indicate the necessary findings as required by subsection (2)(c)(II) of this section, the department shall notify the court and request that the court enter the necessary findings pursuant to subsection (2)(c)(II) of this section.

The department of corrections shall have the authority to make a determination that a person is a sex offender, as defined in section 16-11.7-102 (2)(a), for the purposes of classification and treatment if:

The person has one or more prior convictions for a sex offense as defined in section 16-11.7-102 (3);

The person has a prior offense for which a determination has been made by the court that the underlying factual basis involved a sex offense as defined in section 16-11.7-102 (3); or

The person has been classified as a sex offender in accordance with procedures established by the department of corrections.

The procedures established by the department of corrections to classify a person as a sex offender shall require that:

The classification proceeding be conducted by a licensed attorney who shall serve as an administrative hearing officer;

The offender's attorney be permitted to attend, represent, and assist the offender at the classification proceeding; and

The offender be entitled to written notice of the reason for the proceeding, disclosure of the evidence to be presented against him or her, an opportunity to be heard in person and to present witnesses and documentary evidence, the right to confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses, unless the administrative hearing officer finds good cause for not allowing confrontation, and written findings and conclusions indicating the evidence and reasons relied upon for the classification as a sex offender.

Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, the department of corrections shall ensure that all procedures and policies comply with the federal "Prison Rape Elimination Act of 2003", Pub.L. 108-79, as amended.

In addition to the persons specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, and except as set forth in subsection (3)(b) of this section, any person convicted of an offense in any other state or jurisdiction, including but not limited to a military or federal jurisdiction, for which the person, as a result of the conviction, is required to register if the person resided in the state or jurisdiction of conviction, or for which the person would be required to register if convicted in Colorado, is required to register in the manner specified in section 16-22-108, so long as the person is a temporary or permanent resident of Colorado. The person may petition the court for an order to discontinue the requirement for registration in this state at the times specified in section 16-22-113 for offense classifications that are comparable to the classification of the offense for which the person was convicted in the other state or jurisdiction. The person may petition the court for an order to discontinue the requirement for registration in this state for offense classifications that the person would not be required to register for if convicted in Colorado.

If a juvenile is required to register only pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section and the juvenile's duty to register in another state or jurisdiction has been terminated by a court order, or if a trial court has determined that the juvenile is not required to register in that state or jurisdiction, then the juvenile is not required to fulfill the requirements for registration in Colorado, as set forth in section 16-22-108, and is therefore not required to petition the court for removal from the Colorado sex offender registry pursuant to section 16-22-113.

This article 22 applies to any person who receives a disposition or is adjudicated a juvenile delinquent based on the commission of any act that may constitute unlawful sexual behavior or who receives a deferred adjudication based on commission of any act that may constitute unlawful sexual behavior; except that, with respect to section 16-22-113 (1)(a) to (1)(e), a person who is adjudicated or receives a disposition as a juvenile may petition the court for an order to discontinue the duty to register as provided in those subsections, but only if the person has not subsequently been convicted as an adult of any offense involving unlawful sexual behavior or convicted as an adult of another offense, the underlying factual basis of which involves unlawful sexual behavior. In addition, the duty to provide notice to a person of the duty to register, as set forth in sections 16-22-105 to 16-22-107, applies to juvenile parole and probation officers and appropriate personnel of the division of youth services in the department of human services. If a person is required to register pursuant to this article 22 due to an adjudication or disposition as a juvenile, the duty to register automatically terminates either when the person reaches twenty-five years of age or seven years from the date the juvenile was required to register, whichever occurs later.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article 22 to the contrary, if, pursuant to a motion filed by a person described in this subsection (5) or on its own motion, a court determines that exempting the person from the registration requirement would not pose a significant risk to the community, the court, upon consideration of the totality of the circumstances, may exempt the person from the registration requirements imposed pursuant to this section if:

The person was younger than eighteen years of age at the time of the commission of the offense; and

The person has not been previously adjudicated or received a disposition for a separate offense involving unlawful sexual behavior; and

The person was adjudicated or received a disposition for any offense of unlawful sexual behavior or another offense, the underlying factual basis of which involved unlawful sexual behavior; and

The person has received an evaluation that conforms with the standards developed pursuant to section 16-11.7-103 (4)(i) from an evaluator who meets the standards established by the sex offender management board, and the evaluator recommends exempting the person from the registration requirements based upon the best interests of that person and the community; and

(IV.5) The court has considered a written or oral statement by the victim of the offense for which the juvenile would otherwise be required to register, if provided by the victim, on the question of whether the juvenile should be exempted from the statutory duty to register as a sex offender; and

The court makes written findings of fact specifying the grounds for granting such exemption.

Any defendant who files a motion pursuant to this subsection (5) or the court, if considering its own motion, shall provide notice of the motion to the prosecuting district attorney. In addition, the court shall provide notice of the motion to the victim of the offense. Prior to deciding the motion, the court shall conduct a hearing on the motion at which both the district attorney and the victim shall have opportunity to be heard.

Any person who is required to register pursuant to this section and fails to do so or otherwise fails to comply with the provisions of this article may be subject to prosecution for the offense of failure to register as a sex offender, as described in section 18-3-412.5, C.R.S. Failure of any governmental entity or any employee of any governmental entity to comply with any requirement of this article shall not constitute a defense to the offense of failure to register as a sex offender if there is evidence that the defendant had actual notice of the duty to register.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire article added, p. 1159, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(b), (1)(c), (3), and (5)(a) amended, p. 1108, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 1687, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(3) amended, p. 849, § 1, effective May 14; (2)(d) amended, p. 1754, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 11-1278), ch. 224, p. 960, § 4, effective May 27; (5)(a)(IV) amended, (HB 11-1138), ch. 236, p. 1027, § 9, effective May 27.

L. 2017:

(4) amended, (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1969, § 17, effective June 6; IP(5)(a) and (5)(a)(III) amended, (HB 17-1302), ch. 390, p. 2013, § 2, effective January 1, 2018.

L. 2018:

(3) amended, (SB 18-026), ch. 143, p. 921, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

IP(1), (1)(a), (3), (4), and (5)(a) amended, (HB 21-1064), ch. 320, p. 1962, § 2, effective September 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 17-1302, see section 1 of chapter 390, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

16-22-104. Initial registration - effective date.

Beginning January 1, 2005, for any person required to register pursuant to section 16-22-103, the court, within the later of twenty-four hours or the next business day after sentencing the person, shall electronically file with the CBI the initial registration of the person, providing the information required by the CBI.
(1) (a) (I) Beginning January 1, 2005, for any person required to register pursuant to section 16-22-103, the court, within the later of twenty-four hours or the next business day after sentencing the person, shall electronically file with the CBI the initial registration of the person, providing the information required by the CBI.

Beginning May 27, 2004, the court shall specify on the judgment of conviction the person's duty to register as required in section 16-22-108, including but not limited to the duty to confirm registration if the person is sentenced on or after January 1, 2005, and the person's duty to reregister.

Any person who is sentenced prior to January 1, 2005, and who is required to register pursuant to section 16-22-103 shall initially register in the manner provided and within the times specified in section 16-22-108 (1)(a) for registration.

The state court administrator is hereby authorized to receive and expend any public or private gifts, grants, or donations that may be available to offset the costs incurred in implementing the provisions of this subsection (1).

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire article added, p. 1163, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) amended, p. 759, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1109, § 3, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2)(c) provided for the repeal of subsection (2), effective July 1, 2005. (See L. 2004, p. 1109.)

16-22-105. Notice - requirements - residence - presumption.

Any person who is required to register pursuant to section 16-22-103 shall receive notice of the duty to register as provided in section 16-22-106 or 16-22-107, whichever is applicable. Such notice shall inform the person of the duty to register, in the manner provided in section 16-22-108, with the local law enforcement agency of each jurisdiction in which the person resides. The notice shall inform the person that he or she has a duty to register with local law enforcement agencies in any state or other jurisdiction to which the person may move and that the CBI shall notify the agency responsible for registration in the new state as provided in section 16-22-108 (4). The notice shall also inform the person that, at the time the person registers, he or she must provide his or her date of birth, a current photograph, and a complete set of fingerprints.

Failure of any person to sign the notice of duty to register, as required in sections 16-22-106 and 16-22-107, shall not constitute a defense to the offense of failure to register as a sex offender if there is evidence that the person had actual notice of the duty to register.

For purposes of this article, any person who is required to register pursuant to section 16-22-103 shall register in all jurisdictions in which he or she establishes a residence. A person establishes a residence through an intent to make any place or dwelling his or her residence. The prosecution may prove intent to establish residence by reference to hotel or motel receipts or a lease of real property, ownership of real property, proof the person accepted responsibility for utility bills, proof the person established a mailing address, or any other action demonstrating such intent. Notwithstanding the existence of any other evidence of intent, occupying or inhabiting any dwelling for more than fourteen days in any thirty-day period shall constitute the establishment of residence.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire article added, p. 1163, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 1110, § 4, effective May 27.

16-22-106. Duties - probation department - community corrections administrator - court personnel - jail personnel - notice.

If a person who is required to register pursuant to section 16-22-103 is sentenced to probation, the probation department, as soon as possible following sentencing, shall provide notice, as described in section 16-22-105, to the person of his or her duty to register in accordance with the provisions of this article with the local law enforcement agency of each jurisdiction in which the person resides, and the notice shall include the requirements for a person who registers as "lacks a fixed residence". The person shall be required to sign the notice as confirmation of receipt and to provide the person's date of birth and the address or addresses at which the person resides or a statement that the person lacks a fixed residence. Beginning on May 27, 2004, the court shall specify on the judgment of conviction the duty to register as required in section 16-22-108, including but not limited to the duty to confirm registration if sentenced on or after January 1, 2005, and to reregister.

The probation department shall electronically notify the CBI of the date on which the person's probation is terminated, and the probation department shall notify the CBI if the person absconds or dies prior to the probation termination date. The CBI shall electronically notify the local law enforcement agency of each jurisdiction in which the person resides of the occurrence of any of the events specified in this paragraph (b).

If a person who is required to register pursuant to section 16-22-103 receives a direct sentence to community corrections, the administrator for the community corrections program, or his or her designee, as soon as possible following sentencing, shall provide notice, as described in section 16-22-105, to the person of the duty to register in accordance with the provisions of this article with the local law enforcement agency of each jurisdiction in which the person resides. The person shall be required to sign the notice as confirmation of receipt and to provide the person's date of birth and the address or addresses at which the person resides. The court shall specify on the judgment of conviction the duty to register as required in section 16-22-108, including but not limited to the duty to confirm registration, if sentenced on or after January 1, 2005, and to reregister.

The administrator of the community corrections program, or his or her designee, shall electronically notify the CBI of the date on which the sentence to community corrections is terminated, and the administrator of the community corrections program shall notify the CBI if the person escapes or dies prior to the sentence termination date. The CBI shall electronically notify the local law enforcement agency of each jurisdiction in which the person resides of the occurrence of any of the events specified in this paragraph (b).

If a person who is required to register pursuant to section 16-22-103 is held for more than five business days in a county jail pending court disposition for any offense, the sheriff of the county in which the county jail is located, or his or her designee, shall transmit to the local law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the person was last registered and to the CBI confirmation of the person's registration. The confirmation shall be transmitted on a standardized form provided by the CBI and shall include the address or addresses at which the person will reside while in custody of the county jail, the person's date of birth, a current photograph of the person, and the person's fingerprints.
(3) (a) (I) If a person who is required to register pursuant to section 16-22-103 is held for more than five business days in a county jail pending court disposition for any offense, the sheriff of the county in which the county jail is located, or his or her designee, shall transmit to the local law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the person was last registered and to the CBI confirmation of the person's registration. The confirmation shall be transmitted on a standardized form provided by the CBI and shall include the address or addresses at which the person will reside while in custody of the county jail, the person's date of birth, a current photograph of the person, and the person's fingerprints.

If a person who is required to register pursuant to section 16-22-103 is sentenced to a county jail for any offense, the sheriff of the county in which the county jail is located, or his or her designee, as soon as possible following sentencing, shall transmit to the local law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the person was last registered and to the CBI confirmation of the person's registration. The confirmation shall be transmitted on a standardized form provided by the CBI and shall include the address or addresses at which the person will reside while in custody of the county jail, the person's date of birth, a current photograph of the person, and the person's fingerprints.

The provisions of this paragraph (a) shall apply to persons sentenced on or after January 1, 2005.

At least five days prior to the discharge of the person from custody, the sheriff, or his or her designee, shall provide notice, as described in section 16-22-105, to the person of the duty to register in accordance with the provisions of this article with the local law enforcement agency of each jurisdiction in which the person resides. The person shall be required to sign the notice as confirmation of receipt and to provide the person's date of birth and the address at which the person intends to reside upon discharge.

Within five days, but not fewer than two days, prior to the discharge of the person from custody, the sheriff, or his or her designee, shall notify the CBI and the local law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the person intends to reside of the date of the person's discharge. Such notice, at a minimum, shall include the address at which the person plans to reside upon discharge, provided by the person pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), and the person's date of birth, fingerprints, and current photograph.

(3.5) With regard to a person who is required to register within a state, military, or federal jurisdiction other than Colorado, the chief local law enforcement officer, or his or her designee, of the Colorado jurisdiction in which the person resides shall provide notice, as described in section 16-22-105, to the person as soon as possible after discovering the person's presence in the jurisdiction, of the duty to register in accordance with the provisions of this article with the local law enforcement agency of each Colorado jurisdiction in which the person resides. The person shall be required to sign the notice as confirmation of receipt and to provide the person's date of birth and the address or addresses at which the person resides.

For any person who is required to register pursuant to section 16-22-103, who is not committed to the department of human services, and who is not sentenced to probation, community corrections, county jail, or the department of corrections, the judge or magistrate who has jurisdiction over the person shall, at sentencing, provide notice, as described in section 16-22-105, to the person of the duty to register in accordance with the provisions of this article with the local law enforcement agency of each jurisdiction in which the person resides, and the notice shall include the requirements for a person who registers as "lacks a fixed residence". The person shall be required to sign the notice as confirmation of receipt and to provide the person's date of birth and the address or addresses at which the person resides or a statement that the person lacks a fixed residence.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire article added, p. 1164, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3)(a)(II) amended, p. 759, § 2, effective March 25.

L. 2004:

(1), (2), and (3)(a)(II) amended and (3.5) added, pp. 1110, 1111, §§ 5, 6, effective May 27.

L. 2008:

(3)(c) amended, p. 1885, § 25, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 11-1278), ch. 224, p. 960, § 5, effective May 27.

L. 2012:

(1)(a) and (4) amended, (HB 12-1346), ch. 220, p. 941, § 2, effective July 1.